Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Disposition of Unclaimed Dead Bodies

Cross references.

Law enforcement agencies’ duties as to identification of persons found dead, §§

35-1-8

,

35-3-4

.

31-21-20.
Board for the Distribution of Cadavers.

The academic deans of medical, osteopathic medical, and dental colleges or a representative appointed by the president of such schools incorporated under the laws of this state or otherwise operating in this state with authorization from the Nonpublic Postsecondary Education Commission shall constitute the Board for the Distribution of Cadavers to expedite the distribution and delivery of dead bodies described in Code Section 31-21-21 to and among such institutions as are entitled thereto. This board shall have power to establish rules and regulations for its governance and to appoint and remove its officers and shall keep minutes of its transactions. Records shall be kept, under its direction, of all bodies received and distributed, both from within and without this state, and of the persons or institutions to whom they may be distributed, which records shall be open at all times to the inspection of members of this board, any district attorney, or prosecuting attorney of any city or state court. The board shall appoint a member of the board to be chairperson, and such member shall call at least one meeting per year to carry out the responsibilities of the board. For the purposes of this article, the term “board” shall mean the Board for the Distribution of Cadavers.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 86, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1511; Civil Code 1910, § 1755; Code 1933, § 88-701; Code 1933, § 88-2701, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-25; Ga. L. 2007, p. 472, § 1/SB 204.

31-21-21.
Delivery to board of certain unclaimed bodies.

All public officers of this state and their assistants and all officers and their deputies of every county, city, town, or other municipality and of every prison, county correctional institution, morgue, public hospital, health care facility, except the Central State Hospital which institution shall have authority to perform autopsies on the dead bodies of persons dying as patients therein in the discretion of the superintendent and medical staff of the institution, having control over any dead human body not dead from contagious or infectious disease and required to be buried at public expense are required to notify the board created under Code Section 31-21-20 or such person as may from time to time be designated in writing by such board for distribution or its duly authorized officer whenever any such body comes into their possession or control. Such officers shall, without fee or reward, deliver the body and allow such board and its duly authorized agents who may comply with this chapter to remove such body and to provide for its use only within this state, solely for the advancement of medical science. No such notice shall be given nor shall any such body be delivered if any person, claiming to be and satisfying the authorities in charge of the body that he or she is of any degree of kin, or is related by marriage to, or socially or otherwise connected with and interested in the deceased, shall claim the body for burial, cremation, or other proper disposition; but it shall be at once surrendered to such person or shall be buried at public expense at the request of such claimant if a relative by blood or a connection by marriage and financially unable to provide burial, cremation, or other proper disposition.

A body described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall in each and every instance be held and kept by the person or persons having charge or control of it for at least 24 hours after death, before delivery to such board or its agent for distribution, during which period notice of the death of such person shall be posted at the courthouse door of the county in which such body is held.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1512, 1514; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1756, 1758; Ga. L. 1918, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 130, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 88-702, 88-704; Code 1933, §§ 88-2702, 88-2704, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-21-22.
Disposition of bodies of travelers dying suddenly.

Notice shall not be given nor shall any body be delivered pursuant to Code Section 31-21-21 if the deceased person was a traveler who died suddenly. In such cases, the next of kin shall be notified concerning the disposition of the dead body. If no next of kin is located, or no replies from next of kin are received, or the body is unclaimed within 72 hours, the procedure indicated in this chapter shall apply.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1513; Civil Code 1910, § 1757; Code 1933, § 88-703; Code 1933, § 88-2703, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-21-23.
Distribution of bodies by board.

The board for distribution or its duly authorized agent may distribute bodies received pursuant to Code Section 31-21-21 to and among the schools or colleges described in Code Section 31-21-20 for lectures and demonstrations by such schools or colleges. The number assigned to each shall be based upon the number of bona fide students in each dissecting or operative surgery class, which number of students shall be reported by the schools or colleges to the above-specified board at such times as it may direct, provided that the schools or colleges, upon receiving such bodies and before any use is made of them, and without unnecessary mutilation or dissecting, shall cause them to be embalmed properly and preserved carefully and kept for a period of 60 days from the day of receipt and shall deliver them properly prepared for burial, cremation, or other proper disposition to any persons mentioned and described in Code Section 31-21-21, who shall claim such bodies before the expiration of the period of 60 days and who shall satisfy the officers of the school or college that they are such persons as are entitled under Code Section 31-21-21 to claim such bodies. If, at the expiration of 60 days, such body or bodies have not been claimed for burial in the manner and by the person or persons described in this article, they shall then be used by the schools or colleges for the purposes specified in this article. When the bodies have been so used and are no longer needed or serviceable for the purposes mentioned in this article, they shall be decently interred by the schools or colleges.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 1515; Civil Code 1910, § 1759; Code 1933, § 88-705; Code 1933, § 88-2705, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-21-24.
Transportation of bodies.

The board for distribution may employ a carrier or carriers for the conveyance of bodies described in Code Section 31-21-21, which bodies shall be well enclosed in suitable incasements and carefully deposited free from public observation. The carrier or carriers shall obtain receipts containing the deceased’s name or, if the person is unknown, a description for each body delivered, and shall deposit such receipts with the secretary of the above board, who shall record and preserve them.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 1516; Civil Code 1910, § 1760; Code 1933, § 88-706; Code 1933, § 88-2706, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-21-25.
Bonds.

No school or college shall be allowed or permitted to receive any body or bodies described in Code Section 31-21-21 until a bond shall have been given to the Department of Community Health by or in behalf of the school or college by its authorized officers, to be approved by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the school or college is situated and to be filed in the office of such clerk. The bond shall be in the sum of $5,000.00 and shall be conditioned that the body or bodies received thereafter by the school or college shall be used only in the manner specified in this article and solely for the promotion of medical science in this state. Actions thereon shall be in the name of the Department of Community Health, and any sums recovered shall be deposited in the state treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 1517; Civil Code 1910, § 1761; Code 1933, § 88-707; Code 1933, § 88-2707, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 472, § 2/SB 204; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-21-26.
Payment of expenses.

Neither the state, county, municipality, nor officers thereof shall be placed at any expense by reason of delivery or distribution of bodies; but all expenses thereof shall be borne by those receiving the body or bodies as prescribed by the board for distribution.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 87, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 1518; Civil Code 1910, § 1762; Code 1933, § 88-708; Code 1933, § 88-2708, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.